Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-824
Lottery game retailer; contract with division; considerations.

No person shall sell tickets without first contracting with the division as a lottery game retailer. Persons shall be awarded contracts as lottery game retailers in a manner which best serves the public convenience. Before awarding a contract, the director shall consider the financial responsibility and security of the applicant, the applicant's business or activity, the accessibility of the applicant's place of business or activity to the public, the efficiency of existing lottery game retailers in serving the public convenience, and the volume of expected sales. Political subdivisions or agencies or departments of such political subdivisions may be awarded contracts as lottery game retailers. Notwithstanding this or any other section of the State Lottery Act, nothing shall prohibit an onsite employee of a lottery game retailer from selling lottery tickets.

Laws 1991, LB 849, § 24;

Laws 1993, LB 138, § 44.